Florida, session 2026, SB632.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (c) through (i) of subsection 13 (7) of section 627.748, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 14 paragraphs (d) through (j), respectively, a new paragraph (c) is 15 added to that subsection, and paragraph (a) and present 16 paragraphs (c), (d), and (h) of that subsection are amended, to 17 read: 18 627.748âTransportation network companies.â 19 (7)âTRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND TNC DRIVER INSURANCE 20 REQUIREMENTS.â 21 (a)âBeginning July 1, 2026 2017, a TNC driver or a TNC on 22 behalf of the TNC driver shall maintain primary automobile 23 insurance that: 24 1.âRecognizes that the TNC driver is a TNC driver or 25 otherwise uses a vehicle to transport riders for compensation; 26 and 27 2.âCovers the TNC driver while the TNC driver is logged on 28 to the digital network of the TNC or while the TNC driver is 29 engaged in a prearranged ride. 30 (c)âThe following automobile insurance requirements apply 31 while a participating TNC driver has accepted a prearranged ride 32 but a rider does not occupy the TNC vehicle: 33 1.âAutomobile insurance that provides: 34 a.âA primary automobile liability coverage of at least 35 $50,000 for death and bodily injury per person, $100,000 for 36 death and bodily injury per incident, and $25,000 for property 37 damage; 38 b.âPersonal injury protection benefits that meet the 39 minimum coverage amounts required under ss. 627.730-627.7405; 40 and 41 c.âUninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required 42 by s. 627.727. 43 2.âThe coverage requirements of this paragraph may be 44 satisfied by any of the following: 45 a.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or the 46 TNC vehicle owner; 47 b.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or 48 c.âA combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b. 49 (d)(c)âThe following automobile insurance requirements 50 apply while a TNC driver is engaged in a prearranged ride and a 51 rider occupies the TNC vehicle: 52 1.âAutomobile insurance that provides: 53 a.âA primary automobile liability coverage of at least $1 54 million for death, bodily injury, and property damage; 55 b.âPersonal injury protection benefits that meet the 56 minimum coverage amounts required of a limousine under ss. 57 627.730-627.7405; and 58 c.âUninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required 59 by s. 627.727. 60 2.âThe coverage requirements of this paragraph may be 61 satisfied by any of the following: 62 a.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or the 63 TNC vehicle owner; 64 b.âAutomobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or 65 c.âA combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b. 66 (e)(d)âThe TNC shall maintain the required coverage under 67 paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) unless the driver maintains a 68 policy that does not exclude, pursuant to subsection (8), the 69 required coverage under paragraph (b), paragraph (c), or 70 paragraph (d). If the insurance maintained by the TNC driver TNC 71 driverâs insurance under paragraph (b), or paragraph (c), or 72 paragraph (d) lapses, has lapsed or does not provide the 73 required coverage, the insurance maintained by the TNC must 74 provide the coverage required under this subsection, beginning 75 with the first dollar of a claim, and have the duty to defend 76 such claim. 77 (i)(h)âA TNC driver shall carry proof of coverage 78 satisfying paragraphs (b), and (c), and (d) with him or her at 79 all times during his or her use of a TNC vehicle in connection 80 with a digital network. In the event of an accident, a TNC 81 driver shall provide this insurance coverage information to any 82 party directly involved in the accident or the partyâs 83 designated representative, automobile insurers, and 84 investigating police officers. Proof of financial responsibility 85 may be presented through an electronic device, such as a digital 86 phone application, under s. 316.646. Upon request, a TNC driver 87 shall also disclose to any party directly involved in the 88 accident or the partyâs designated representative, automobile 89 insurers, and investigating police officers whether he or she 90 was logged on to a digital network or was engaged in a 91 prearranged ride at the time of the accident. 92 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.